Massachusetts, session 194th, H4580.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the select board 
of the Town of Berlin shall consist of five members, elected at large by the voters of the Town.  
SECTION 2. At the first annual town election following the effective date of this act, 
three select board members shall be elected. The candidate receiving the highest number of votes 
shall serve for a term of three years. The candidate receiving the second highest number of votes 
shall serve for a term of two years. The candidate receiving the third highest number of votes 
shall serve for a term of one year. Thereafter, upon the expiration of their terms, members shall 
be elected for terms of three years.  
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.